Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 9
PETITIONS FOR CANDIDACY

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980, and this part 9 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 9 prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1992. For a detailed comparison of articles 1 to 13 for 1980 and of this part 9 for 1992, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

1-4-901. Designation of petition.

The petition for a candidate may consist of one or more sheets, to be fastened together in the form of one petition section, but each sheet shall contain the same heading and each petition section shall contain one sworn affidavit of the circulator. Except for the joint candidates for president and vice president and the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, no petition shall contain the name of more than one person for the same office.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 687, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1406, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 831, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) repealed, p. 1740, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1002, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 681, § 14, effective May 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-603 (3) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For designation of candidates by assembly, see § 1-4-601; for designation of party candidates by petition, see § 1-4-603; for nomination of candidates by convention, see § 1-4-701.

1-4-902. Form of petition.

The signatures to a petition need not all be appended to one paper, but no petition is legal that does not contain the requisite number of names of eligible electors whose names do not appear on any other petition previously filed for the same office under this section.

At the top of each page shall be printed, in bold-faced type, the following:

Directly following the warning in subsection (2) of this section shall be printed in bold-faced type the following:

Petition to nominate (name of person sought to be elected to) the office of (title of office).

WARNING:
IT IS AGAINST THE LAW:

For anyone to sign this petition with any name other than one's own or to knowingly sign one's name more than once for the same candidate or to knowingly sign the petition when not a registered elector.
Do not sign this petition unless you are an eligible elector. To be an eligible elector you must be registered to vote and eligible to vote in (name of political subdivision) elections.
Do not sign this petition unless you have read or have had read to you the proposed nomination petition in its entirety and understand its meaning.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 687, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1766, § 4, effective June 6.

L. 95:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 831, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-158), ch. 170, p. 622, § 12, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) is similar to former § 1-4-801 (1)(d) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 14-158, see section 1 of chapter 170, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

1-4-903. Approval of petition.

No petition shall be circulated until it has been approved as meeting the requirements of this section as to form. The secretary of state or the official with whom the petitions are to be filed shall approve or disapprove a petition as to form by the close of the second business day following submission of the proposed petition. The secretary of state or official, as applicable, shall mail or e-mail written notice of the action taken to the person who submitted the petition on the day the action is taken.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 688, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 832, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1740, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1641, § 19, effective June 21.

Cross references:

For filing a certificate of designation, see § 1-4-604; for convention nominations, see § 1-4-701.

1-4-904. Signatures on the petitions.

Every petition shall be signed only by eligible electors.

For petitions to nominate candidates from a major political party in a partisan election, each signer must be affiliated with the major political party named in the petition and shall state the following to the circulator: That the signer has been affiliated with the major political party named in the petition for at least twenty-two days as shown in the statewide voter registration system and that the signer has not signed any other petition for any other candidate for the same office.

Petitions to nominate candidates from a minor political party or unaffiliated candidates in a partisan election may be signed by any eligible elector who has not signed any other petition for any other candidate for the same office.

Unless physically unable, all electors shall sign their own signature and shall print their names, their respective residence addresses, including the street number and name, the city or town, the county, and the date of signature. Each signature on a petition shall be made, to the extent possible, in black ink.

Any person, except a circulator, may assist an elector who is physically unable to sign the petition in completing the information on the petition as required by law. On the petition, immediately following the name of the disabled elector, the person providing assistance shall sign, provide the person's address, and state that the assistance was given to the disabled elector.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 688, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 34, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 765, § 28, effective May 20.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1626, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1311, § 8, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 577, § 32, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) and (4) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1641, § 20, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-603 (3) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For designation of candidates by assembly, see § 1-4-601; for designation of party candidates by petition, see § 1-4-603; for nomination of candidates by convention, see § 1-4-701.

1-4-905. Circulators - requirements - affidavits - notarization - training.

A person shall not circulate a petition to nominate a candidate unless the person is a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age.

Each petition section must have attached a signed, notarized, and dated affidavit executed by the person who circulated the petition section, which must include: The affiant's printed name, the address at which the affiant resides, including the street name and number, the city or town, the county, and the date of signature; a statement that the affiant has read and understands the laws governing the circulation of petitions; a statement that the affiant was a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age at the time the section of the petition was circulated and signed by the listed electors; a statement that the affiant circulated the section of the petition; a statement that each signature on the petition section was affixed in the affiant's presence and is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be; a statement that to the best of the affiant's knowledge and belief each of the persons signing the petition section was, at the time of signing, an eligible elector; a statement that the affiant has not paid or will not in the future pay and that the affiant believes that no other person has paid or will pay, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value to any signer for the purpose of inducing or causing the signer to sign the petition; a statement that the affiant understands that the affiant can be prosecuted for violating the law governing the circulation of petitions, including the requirement that the affiant truthfully completed the affidavit and that each signature thereon was affixed in the affiant's presence; and a statement that the affiant understands that failing to make himself or herself available to be deposed and to provide testimony in the event of a protest shall invalidate the petition section if it is challenged on the grounds of circulator fraud.

A notary public shall not notarize an affidavit required under subsection (2)(a) of this section unless:

The circulator is in the physical presence of the notary public; and

The circulator has dated the affidavit and fully and accurately completed all of the personal information on the affidavit required by subsection (2)(a) of this section.

An affidavit that is notarized in violation of any provision of subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section is invalid.

If the date signed by a circulator on an affidavit required under subsection (2)(a) of this section is different from the date signed by the notary public, the affidavit is invalid. If a notary public notarizes an affidavit that has not been dated by the circulator, the notarization date does not cure the circulator's failure to date the affidavit and the affidavit is invalid.

Payment of money or other things of value to any person for the purpose of inducing the person to sign the petition.

The designated election official shall not accept for filing any section of a petition which does not have attached to it the notarized affidavit required by this section. Any signature added to a section of a petition after the affidavit has been executed is invalid.

As part of any court proceeding or hearing conducted by the secretary of state or designated election official related to a protest of all or part of a petition section, the circulator of such petition section shall be required to make himself or herself available to be deposed and to testify in person, by telephone, or by any other means permitted under the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Except as set forth in subsection (4)(b) of this section, the petition section that is the subject of the protest shall be invalid if a circulator fails to comply with the requirement set forth in this subsection (4)(a) for any protest that includes an allegation of circulator fraud that is pled with particularity regarding:

(I) Forgery of an eligible elector's signature;

(II) Circulation of a petition section, in whole or part, by anyone other than the person who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section;

(III) Use of a false circulator name or address in the affidavit; or

Upon the finding by a district court, the secretary of state, or the designated election official that the circulator of a petition section is unable to be deposed or to testify at trial or a hearing conducted by the secretary of state or designated election official because the circulator has died, become mentally incompetent, or become medically incapacitated and physically unable to testify by any means whatsoever, the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of this section do not apply to invalidate a petition section circulated by the circulator.

A candidate or candidate committee shall maintain a list of the names and addresses of all circulators who circulated petition sections on behalf of the candidate, the notaries public who notarized petition sections on behalf of the candidate, and the petition section numbers that each circulator circulated and that each notary public notarized. A copy of the list shall be filed with the secretary of state or designated election official along with the petition. If a copy of the list is not filed, the secretary of state or designated election official shall prepare the list and charge the proponents a fee to cover the actual cost of the preparation. Once filed or prepared by the secretary of state or designated election official, the list is a public record for purposes of article 72 of title 24.

A circulator who is not to be paid for circulating a petition shall display an identification badge that includes the words "VOLUNTEER CIRCULATOR" in bold-faced type that is clearly legible.

A circulator who is to be paid for circulating a petition shall display an identification badge that includes the words "PAID CIRCULATOR" in bold-faced type that is clearly legible and the name and telephone number of the individual employing the circulator.

The secretary of state shall develop circulator training programs for paid and volunteer circulators and shall offer the training programs in the most cost-effective manner available. A candidate, committee, or petition entity shall inform paid and volunteer circulators of the availability of these training programs as one manner of complying with the requirement set forth in the circulator's affidavit that a circulator read and understand the laws pertaining to petition circulation.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 689, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 634, § 7, effective May 6.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1002, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1971, § 9, effective August 3.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 577, § 33, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended and (4), (5), (6), and (7) added, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3013, § 21, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(b)(I) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1641, § 21, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-603 (8) as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-905.5. Petition entities - requirements - violations - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Candidate" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (2) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Candidate committee" has the same meaning as set forth in section 2 (3) of article XXVIII of the state constitution.

"Petition entity" means any person or committee that directly or indirectly provides payment to a circulator to circulate a petition to nominate a candidate or to recall an elected officer in accordance with article 12 of this title 1.

"Recall committee" means the committee of signers described in section 1-12-108 (2)(b).

It is unlawful for any petition entity to provide payment to a circulator to circulate a petition to nominate a candidate or to recall an elected officer without first obtaining a license from the secretary of state.

The secretary of state may deny a license if he or she finds that the petition entity or any of its principals have been found, in a judicial or administrative proceeding, to have authorized or knowingly permitted any of the acts set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section, or to have knowingly contracted with a petition entity that has been found, in a judicial or administrative proceeding, to have authorized or knowingly permitted any of the acts set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

The secretary of state shall deny a license if no current representative of the petition entity has completed the training related to potential fraudulent activities in petition circulation as established by the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-4-905 (7).

The secretary of state shall revoke a petition entity's license if, at any time after receiving a license, the petition entity is determined to no longer be in compliance with the requirements set forth in subsection (2)(b) of this section or if the petition entity authorized or knowingly permitted:

Forgery of a registered elector's signature;

Circulation of a petition section, in whole or part, by anyone other than the circulator who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section;

Use of a false circulator name or address in the affidavit;

Payment of money or other things of value to any person for the purpose of inducing the person to sign or withdraw his or her name from a petition; or

A notary public's notarization of a circulator affidavit outside of the physical presence of the circulator or without the production of the required identification for notarization of a petition section.

Whenever the secretary of state believes that a violation of this section has occurred, the secretary of state may investigate the violation. The secretary of state may also investigate possible violations of this section upon a signed complaint from any person.

If the secretary of state denies, revokes, suspends, or imposes a condition on a license, the applicant or licensee is entitled to timely notice and hearing in accordance with article 4 of title 24.

If, after a hearing, the secretary of state finds that an unlicensed petition entity circulated a petition in violation of this section, the secretary of state shall fine the petition entity in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per circulator for each day that the individual or individuals circulated petition sections on behalf of the unlicensed petition entity.

If, after a hearing, the secretary of state finds that a petition entity violated a provision of subsection (2)(c) of this section or contracted with a petition entity that violated a provision of subsection (2)(c) of this section, the secretary shall revoke the entity's license for not less than ninety days or more than one hundred eighty days. Upon finding any subsequent violation of a provision of subsection (2)(c) of this section, the secretary shall revoke the petition entity's license for not less than one hundred eighty days or more than one year. The secretary shall consider all circumstances surrounding the violations in fixing the length of the revocations.

If, after a hearing, the secretary of state finds that a petition entity violated the requirements of subsection (5) of this section, the secretary shall fine the petition entity in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars.

A petition entity whose license has been revoked may apply for reinstatement to be effective upon expiration of the term of revocation.

In determining whether to reinstate a license, the secretary of state may consider:

The entity's ownership by, employment of, or contract with any person who served as a director, officer, owner, or principal of a petition entity whose license was revoked under this section or section 1-40-135, the role of such individual in the facts underlying the prior license revocation, and the role of such individual in a petition entity's post-revocation activities; and

Any other facts the entity chooses to present to the secretary, including but not limited to remedial steps, if any, that have been implemented to avoid future acts that would violate this article 4 or article 40 of this title 1.

The name and signature of the designated agent of the petition entity for the candidate, candidate committee, or recall committee.

The secretary of state shall issue a decision on any application for a new or reinstated license within ten business days after a petition entity files an application. The application must be on a form prescribed by the secretary and must include, at a minimum:

(I) The name of any candidate, candidate committee, or recall committee for which a petition will be circulated by circulators coordinated or paid by the petition entity;

(II) The current name, address, telephone number, and electronic-mail address of the petition entity; and

A petition entity shall notify the secretary of state within twenty days of any change in the information submitted pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section.

The secretary of state shall charge a nonrefundable license fee for each application in accordance with section 24-21-104 (3).

A petition entity shall ensure that a petition circulated by the entity is delivered to the candidate, candidate committee, or recall committee no later than three days before the deadline for the candidate to file the petition.

The secretary of state may create a single application and license, and charge a single fee, for entities subject to this section and section 1-40-135.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3015, § 22, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(c), (2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (3)(d), (4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(III), and (5) amended and (1)(d) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1642, § 22, effective June 21.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-906. Candidate's acceptance.

Every nominating petition before it is filed shall have attached to it a notarized acceptance of the nomination of the candidate or notarized acceptances by both of the joint candidates. Each acceptance of nomination shall contain the full name of the candidate or joint candidate as the name will appear on the ballot and the candidate's full address.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 690, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-603 (4) as it existed prior to 1992.

1-4-907. Filing of petition.

The petition, when executed and acknowledged as prescribed in this part 9, shall be filed as follows: With the secretary of state if it is for an office that is voted on by the electors of the entire state or of a congressional district or for the offices of members of the general assembly or district attorney or a district office of state concern; with the county clerk and recorder if it is for a county office; and with the designated election official if it is for a nonpartisan local election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 690, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1621, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 832, § 35, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-801 (1)(h) as it existed prior to 1992.

1-4-908. Review of petition - signature verification - notification - cure - rules.

Upon filing, the designated election official for the political subdivision shall review all petition information and verify the information against the registration records, and, where applicable, the county assessor's records. The secretary of state shall establish guidelines for verifying petition entries.

(1.5) (a) In any election conducted after January 1, 2018, for any petition that must be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-4-907, the secretary of state shall compare each signature on a candidate petition with the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration system. The secretary of state may use a signature verification device to compare the signatures.

If it is determined that the signature on the petition does not match the signature of the eligible elector stored in the statewide voter registration database, or if a signature verification device is unable to determine that the signatures match, a second review shall be made by an employee of the secretary of state's office or a designee trained in signature verification. If the employee or designee agrees that the signatures do not match, the secretary of state shall, within three days of determining the signature deficiency, notify the candidate of such deficiency.

To cure a signature that failed the signature verification process described in subsection (1.5)(b)(I) of this section, a candidate must provide the secretary of state with a statement, signed by the elector whose signature failed the verification process, that states substantially that the elector signed the petition. The statement must be accompanied by a copy of the elector's identification, as defined in section 1-1-104 (19.5). The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for the statement. To cure the signature deficiency, the candidate must return the statement and a copy of the elector's identification to the secretary of state within three days of the date the secretary notifies the candidate of the signature deficiency.

The secretary of state may promulgate rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, to implement this subsection (1.5).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 832, § 36, effective July 1, 1995.)

(2.5) If, while verifying a signer's information against the registration records in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the designated election official finds that the signer provided his or her mailing address rather than his or her residence address as required under section

1-4-904 (3)

, the designated election official may accept the signature line as valid if the designated election official is able to locate the signer's record in the statewide voter registration database and determine that the signer was eligible to sign the petition.

After review, the official shall notify the candidate of the number of valid signatures and whether the petition appears to be sufficient or insufficient. In the case of a petition for nominating an unaffiliated candidate, the official shall provide notification of sufficiency or insufficiency to the candidate no later than ninety-six days before the general election. Upon determining that the petition is sufficient and after the time for protest has passed, the designated election official shall certify the candidate to the ballot, and, if the election is a coordinated election, so notify the coordinated election official.

If a partisan candidate who submitted a candidate petition for review accesses the ballot by assembly before the designated election official declares the petition sufficient or insufficient, the candidate must immediately inform the designated election official. Upon receiving notification, the designated election official shall cease review and shall consider the petition to have never been submitted.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 690, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1154, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 832, § 36, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 886, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1064, § 11, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 681, § 15, effective May 17.

L. 2017:

(1.5) added, (HB 17-1088), ch. 398, p. 2076, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2.5) and (4) added, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3018, § 23, effective August 2.

1-4-909. Protest of designations and nominations.

A petition or certificate of designation or nomination that has been verified and appears to be sufficient under this code shall be deemed valid unless a petition for a review of the validity of the petition pursuant to section 1-1-113 is filed with the district court within five days after the election official's statement of sufficiency is issued or, in the case of a certificate of designation, within five days after the certificate of designation is filed with the designated election official.

(1.5) If the election official determines that a petition is insufficient, the candidate named in the petition may petition the district court within five days for a review of the determination pursuant to section 1-1-113.

This section does not apply to any nomination made at a primary election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 690, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1407, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 833, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1002, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1971, § 10, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-901 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For designation of candidates by assembly, see § 1-4-601; for designation of party candidates by petition, see § 1-4-603; for nomination of candidates by convention, see § 1-4-701.

1-4-910. Protest to a recall petition. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 691, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1154, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 833, § 38, effective July 1.

1-4-911. Review of a protest.

The party filing a protest has the burden of sustaining the protest by a preponderance of the evidence. The decision upon matters of substance is open to review, if prompt application is made, as provided in section 1-1-113. The remedy in all cases shall be summary, and the decision of any court having jurisdiction shall be final and not subject to review by any other court; except that the supreme court, in the exercise of its discretion, may review any judicial proceeding in a summary way.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 691, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-4-901 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-4-912. Cure - rules.

Repealed.

During the review of any candidate's petition that is required to be filed with the secretary of state's office, the secretary of state shall notify the candidate of any errors and insufficiencies regarding circulator affidavits. Upon the receipt of such a notification, the candidate has five calendar days from the date of receipt of the notice to cure the errors and insufficiencies described in the notice. To cure a circulator affidavit, the candidate must provide the secretary of state with a new circulator affidavit that corrects the errors of the previously submitted affidavit.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, to implement this section, as amended.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 691, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1407, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1155, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 887, 861, 833, §§ 4, 117, 39, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 765, § 29, effective May 20.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1399, § 18, effective June 6; (1) amended, p. 1434, § 18, effective June 6.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1065, § 12, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 681, § 16, effective May 17.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 947, § 4, effective August 9; entire section amended, (HB 17-1088), ch. 398, p. 2077, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1) repealed and (2) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3018, § 24, effective August 2.

1-4-913. Defacing of petitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part R&RE, p. 692, § 7, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 834, § 40, effective July 1.